California, session 20252026, SB933.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 22605 is added to the Financial Code, immediately following Section 22604, to read:22605. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Consumer report” has the same meaning as defined in the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681a).(2) “Financial institution” includes both of the following:(A) Any depository or nondepository lender, including a mortgage broker or originator licensed under this division, the California Financing Law (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 22000)), or the Real Estate Law (Part 1 (commencing with Section 10000) of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code).(B) Any person engaged in consumer lending or mortgage lending or servicing within this state.(3) (A) “Mortgage trigger lead” means a consumer report or related data obtained from a consumer reporting agency in accordance with Section 1681b of Title 15 of the United States Code, if the request is initiated by a credit inquiry related to a real estate-secured loan application. (B) “Mortgage trigger lead” does not include either of the following:(i) A consumer report obtained by the financial institution with which the consumer directly applied.(ii) A servicer or creditor of an existing account.(b) A financial institution shall not engage in unfair, deceptive, or abusive acts or practices in the use of mortgage trigger lead information. A violation of this subdivision occurs if the financial institution does any of the following acts:(1) Fails to clearly and conspicuously disclose to the consumer, at the initial point of contact, that the financial institution is not affiliated with the consumer’s original lender or broker.(2) Fails to comply with all applicable state and federal laws regarding prescreened solicitations, including, but not limited to, providing a firm offer of credit.(3) Uses consumer information in violation of either of the following:(A) The consumer’s opt-out request from prescreened offers under federal law.(B) The consumer’s registration on the federal “do not call” registry.(4) Engages in bait-and-switch marketing by both:(A) Offering specific rates, terms, or costs.(B) Subsequently changing those terms to the consumer’s detriment, unless clearly disclosed and justified.(c) (1) A violation of this section constitutes an unlawful, unfair, or deceptive business practice under Section 17200 of the Business and Professions Code. (2) The Attorney General, the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation, and local prosecutors may enforce this section.(3) A consumer who suffers a violation of this section may bring a private right of action for damages, injunctive relief, and reasonable attorney’s fees, in accordance with applicable law.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.